District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.72

Eligibility requirements.

An applicant for an occupational license as a barber shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Barber and Cosmetology that the applicant:

(1)

Has passed the examination or examinations required by the Board; and

(2)

Meets any other requirements established by rule to ensure that the applicant has had the proper training and is otherwise qualified to practice the occupation, manage a facility where such occupation is performed, own such a facility or teach the occupation.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.72.
This section is referenced in § 47-2853.12.